Utah statutes.
31A-23a-107.   Character requirements.
Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall show to the commissioner
that:
(1) the applicant has the intent in good faith, to engage in the type of
business that the license applied for would permit;
(2)  if a natural person, the applicant is competent and trustworthy; or, if
the applicant is an agency, all the partners, directors, or principal officers
or persons having comparable powers are trustworthy, and that it will transact
business in such a way that all acts that may only be performed by a licensed
producer, limited line producer, customer service representative, consultant,
managing general agent, or reinsurance intermediary are performed exclusively
by natural persons who are licensed under this chapter to transact that type
of business and designated on the agency's license;
(3) the applicant intends to comply with Section 31A-23a-502; and
(4)  if a natural person, the applicant is at least 18 years of age.
